Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-111 of Title 43A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Mobile crisis team” means a group of professionals that


includes a licensed mental health professional and a certified peer


recovery support specialist or case manager and that is employed or


contracted by the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services or a political subdivision of this state to provide


community-based crisis intervention services outside of facilities



Req. No. 2182 Page 1


to individuals experiencing alcohol-related, drug-related, or mental


health crises;


2. “Request for assistance” means a call, dispatch, referral,


or other notification requesting a response from a mobile crisis


team to an individual experiencing a mental health, substance use,


or suicidal crisis; and


3. “Safety-related information” means any information


documented in a law enforcement agency’s computer-aided dispatch


system or record management system related to an individual or


address that is relevant to the physical safety of responders at a


scene including, but not limited to:


a. history of violent behavior, threats, or aggression,


b. possession of weapons or firearms,


c. prior incidents related to violent or threatening


behavior or mental health crises that required law


enforcement intervention,


d. outstanding warrants, and


e. any other relevant information that a person could


reasonably assume would indicate a risk to a mobile


crisis team.


B. 1. When a mobile crisis team receives a request for


assistance, the mobile crisis team may request any safety-related


information from a municipal or county law enforcement agency before


responding to a request for assistance.

Req. No. 2182 Page 2


2. Municipal and county law enforcement agencies in this state


shall develop a protocol to ensure timely access to and delivery of


safety-related information to a mobile crisis team that pertains to


the address or individual requiring a response from the mobile


crisis team.


C. 1. Any safety-related information disclosed pursuant to


this section shall be limited to what is deemed reasonably necessary


to ensure the safety of the mobile crisis team and shall remain


confidential except as otherwise required by law.


2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the


disclosure of sealed or expunged records or the collection or


retention of information not already within the possession of a law


enforcement agency.


D. An employee of a law enforcement agency who discloses


safety-related information in accordance with protocols developed by


the agency pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be


immune from liability arising from such disclosure.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2182 CN 12/10/2025 1:13:56 PM









Req. No. 2182 Page 3